test/tools/mt/apertium/apertiumtests_mt-apertium-desc.und.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../../../tools/mt/apertium/generator-mt-apertium-norm.nob.hfstol
    Morph: ../../../../tools/mt/apertium/analyser-mt-apertium-desc.nob.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../../../tools/mt/apertium/generator-mt-apertium-norm.nob.xfst
    Morph: ../../../../tools/mt/apertium/analyser-mt-apertium-desc.nob.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# Tag tests:
  G3 - vuorru:
    vuorru<n><g3><sem_ani><sg><gen>: vuorru

  G7 - gálli:
    gálli<n><g7><sg><gen>: gálli

  NomAg - nubbijođiheaddji:
    nubbijođiheaddji<n><nomag><sem_hum><sg><nom>: nubbijođiheaddji

# No variant tags should be visible:
  v1 - rekruterenoassi:
    rekruterenoassi<n><sg><gen>: rekruterenoasi

  v2 - servodatfágalinjá:
    servodatfágalinjá<n><sg><gen>: servvodatfágalinjjá

  v3 - lohkanlistu:
    lohkanlistu<n><sg><gen>: lohkanlisttá

  v4 - servodatvásihus:
    servodatvásihus<n><sg><gen>: servvodatvásihusa

  v5 - sihkkelkursa:
    sihkkelkursa<n><sg><gen>: syhkkelgurssa

  v6 - eanahálddašanláhka:
    eanahálddašanláhka<n><sem_txt><sg><gen>: eatnanhálddahanlága

  v7 - eahkediskursa:
    eahkediskursa<n><sg><gen>: eahketkurssa

  v8 - diibmolistu:
    diibmolistu<n><sg><gen>: tiibmalistta

# Sem tags in all cases, used for disambiguation:
  Sem/Sur - Risten:
    Risten<n><prop><sem_sur><sg><nom>: Risten

  Sem/Plc - Romsa:
    Romsa<n><prop><sem_plc><sg><gen>: Romssa

  Sem/Hum - ipmil:
    ipmil<n><sem_hum><sg><nom>: ipmil

  Sem/Veh - biila:
    biila<n><sem_veh><sg><gen>: biilla

  Sem/Txt - girji:
    girji<n><sem_txt><sg><gen>: girjji

# Adverbial clitics should be recognised and qst moved before foc_naj:
  Clitics - gielanaigo:
    giella<n><sem_lang_tool><sg><gen><qst>+naj<pcle>: gielanaigo

# No dialect tags:
  No dialect tags - earenoamáš:
    erenoamáš<adj><sg><nom>: earenoamáš

# Allow passive derivations and goahti:

  Accept passive derivation:
    oaivvildit<vblex><tv><der_passl><vblex><iv><indic><pres><p3><sg>: oaivvilduvvo

  Accept both long and short passives:
    gullat<vblex><tv><der_passl><vblex><iv><indic><pres><p2><sg>: gullojuvvot
    gullat<vblex><tv><der_passs><vblex><iv><indic><pres><p2><sg>: gullot

  Accept derivations with Der/goahti:
    gullat<vblex><tv><der_goahti><vblex><indic><pres><p2><sg>: gullagoađát

# Test that compounds go through with the expected form and analysis:
  Compound1:
    biila<n><sem_veh><cmp_sgnom><cmp>+guovlu<n><sem_plc><sg><nom>: biilaguovlu
